             Valley Spirit October 1862 Newspaper Transcriptions

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 10, 1862, p. 2, c. 1

                          The Contest In Maryland!

  Great Battle of Wednesday--Graphic and Interesting Particulars--Terrible
    Manslaughters--Desperation of the Rebels--Heroic Determination of our
    Troops--Fighting Joe Hooker Glorious Again--Gallantry of Officers and
 Men--The Union Army Victorious in Each Day's Fight--Accounts of our Losses.

The Tribune has the following despatch, dated:

Battle-Field of Sharpsburg, Wednesday evening Sept. 17, 1862--Fierce and
desperate battle between 200,000 men has raged since daylight, yet night
closes on an uncertain field. It is the greatest fight since Waterloo; all
over the field contested with an obstinacy equal even to Waterloo. If not
wholly a victory tonight, I believe it is the prelude to a victory
to-morrow. But what can be foretold of the future of a fight in which from
five in the morning till seven at night the best troops of the continent
have fought without decisive result.

I have no time for speculation; no time even to gather details of the
battle, only time to state its broadest features, then mount and spur for
New York.

After the brilliant victory near Middletown, General McClellan pushed
forward his army rapidly, and reached Keedysville with three corps on Monday
night. That march has already been described. On the day following the two
armies faced each other idly, until night. Artillery was busy at intervals,
once in the morning opening with spirit, and continuing for half an hour
with vigor, till the Rebel battery, as usual, was silenced.

McClellan was on the hill where Benjamin's battery was stationed, and found
himself suddenly under a rather heavy fire. It was still uncertain whether
the Rebels were retreating or reinforcing; their batteries would remain in
position to either case, and as they had withdrawn nearly all their troops
from view there was only the doubtful indication of columns of dust to the
rear.

On the evening of Tuesday Hooker was ordered to cross the Antietam creek
with his corps, and, feeling the left of the enemy, to be ready to attack
next morning. During the day of apparent inactivity McClellan had been
maturing his plan of battle, of which Hooker's movement was one development.

The position on either side was peculiar--When Richardson advanced on Monday
he found the enemy deployed and displayed in force on a crescent-shaped
ridge, the outline of which followed, more or less exactly, the course of
Antietam creek. Their lines were then forming and the revelation of force in
front of the ground which they really intended to hold was probably meant to
delay our attack until their arrangements to receive it were complete.

During the day they kept their troops exposed, and did not move them to
avoid the artillery fire, which must have been occasionally annoying. Next
morning the lines and columns which had darkened cornfields and hill crests
had been withdrawn. Broken and wooded ground behind the sheltering hills
concealed the Rebel masses. What from our front looked like only a narrow
summit fringed with woods, was a broad table-land of forest and ravine,
cover for troops everywhere, nowhere easy access for an enemy. The smoothly
sloping surface in front and the sweeping crescents os [sic] slowly mingling
lines was all a delusion. It was all a Rebel stronghold beyond.

Under the base of the hills runs the deep stream called Antietam Creek,
fordable only at distant points. Three bridges cross it--one on the
Hagerstown road, one on the Sharpsburg pike; and one to the left, in a deep
recess of sleepy falling hills. Hooker passed the first to reach the ford by
which he crossed, and it was held by Pleasanton with a reserve of cavalry
during the battle. The second was close under the Rebel centre, and no way
important to yesterday's fight. At the third, Burnside attacked and finally
crossed. Between the first and third lay the battle lines. They stretched
four miles from right to left.

Unaided attack in front was impossible. McClellan's forces lay behind low,
disconnected ridges, in front of the Rebel summits, all or nearly all
unwooded. They gave some cover for artillery, and guns were, therefore,
massed on the centre. The enemy had the Shepherdstown road and the
Hagerstown and Williamsport road both open to him in rear for retreat. Along
one or the other, if beaten, he must fly. This, among other reasons,
determined, perhaps, the plan of battle which McClellan finally resolved on.

The plan was generally as follows: Hooker was to cross on the right,
establish himself on the enemy's left if possible, flanking his position,
and to open the fight. Sumner, Franklin and Mansfield were to send their
forces also to the right, co-operating with and sustaining Hooker's attack,
while advancing also nearer the centre. The heavy work in the centre was
left mostly to the batteries. Porter massing his infantry support in the
hollows. On the left Burnside was to carry the bridge already referred to,
advancing then by a road which enters the pike at Sharpsburg, turning at
once the Rebel flank and destroying his line of retreat. Porter and Sykes
were held in reserve. It is obvious that the complete success of a plan
contemplating widely divergent movements of separate corps, must largely
depend on accurate timing, that the attack should be simultaneous and not
successive.

Hooker moved Tuesday afternoon at four crossing the creek at a ford above
the creek and well to the right, without opposition. Fronting southwest his
line advanced not quite on the Rebel flank, but overlapping and threatening
it. Turning of[f] from the road after passing the stream, he sent forth
cavalry skirmishers straight into the woods and over the field beyond. Rebel
pickets withdrew slowly before them, firing scattering and harmless shots.
Turning again to the left, the cavalry went down on the Rebel flank, coming
suddenly close to a battery which met them with unexpected grape and
canister. It being the motive of cavalry to retire before the batteries,
this company loyalty followed the law of its being and came swiftly back
without pursuit.

Artillery was sent to the front, infantry was rapidly deployed, and
skirmishers went out in front and on either flank. The corps moved forward
compactly, Hooker, as usual, reconnoitering in person. They came at last to
an open grass-sown field included on two sides with woods; protected on the
right of the hill, and entered through a corn-field in the rear. Skirmishers
entering these woods were immediately met by rebel shots, but held their
ground, and as soon, supported, advanced and cleared the timber. Beyond, on
the left and in front, volleys of musketry opened heavily, and a battle
seemed to have begun a little sooner than it was expected.

General Hooker formed his lines with precision and without hesitation.
Ricketts' division went into the woods on the left in force. Meade, with the
Pennsylvania Reserves, formed in the centre. Doubleday was sent out on the
right, planting his batteries on the hill, and opening at once on a rebel
battery that began to enfilade the central line. It was already dark, and
the rebel position could only be discovered by the flashes of their guns.
They pushed forward boldly on the right, after losing ground on the other
flank, but made no attempt to regain their hold on the woods. The fight
flashed, and glimmered, and faded and finally went out in the dark.

Hooker had found out what he wanted to know. When the firing ceased the
hostile lines lay close to each other, their pickets so near that six rebels
were captured during the night. It was inevitable that the fight should
recommence at daylight. Neither side had suffered considerable loss; it was
a skirmish, not a battle. "We are through for the night," remarked the
General, "but to-morrow we fight the battle that will decide the fate of the
republic."

Not long after the firing ceased it sprang up again on the left. General
Hooker, who had taken up his head-quarters in a barn, which had been nearly
the focus of the rebel artillery, was out at once. First came rapid and
unusual picket shots, then several heavy volleys. The General listened a
moment and smiled grimly.

"We have no troops there. The troops are shooting each other. It is Fair
Oaks over again." So everybody lay down again, but all the night through
there were frequent alarms.

McClellan had been informed of the night's work, and of the certainties
awaiting the dawn. Sumner was ordered to move his corps at once, and was
expected to be on the ground at day-light. From the extent of the rebel
lines developed in the evening, it was plain that they had gathered their
whole army behind the heights and were waiting for the shock.

The battle began with the dawn. Morning found both armies just as they had
slept, almost close enough to look into each other's eyes. The left of
Meade's Reserves and the right of Rickett's line became engaged at nearly
the same moment, one with artillery, the other with infantry. A battery was
almost immediately pushed forward beyond the central woods, over a plowed
field, near the top of the slope where the cornfield began. On the open
field, in the corn beyond and in the woods which stepped forward into the
broad fields, like a promontory into the ocean, was the hardest and
deadliest struggle of the day.

For half an hour after the battle had grown to its full strength, the line
of fire swayed neither way. Hooker's men were fully up to their work. They
saw their General everywhere in front, never away from the fire, and all the
troops believed in their commander, and fought with a will. Two-thirds of
them were the same men who, under MacDowell, had broken at Manassas.

The half hour passed, the Rebels began to give way a little, only a little,
but at the first indication of a receding fire, Forward, was the word, and
on went the line with a cheer and a rush. Back across the cornfield, leaving
dead and wounded behind them, over the fence, and across the road, and then
back again into the dark woods which closed around them, went the retreating
Rebels.

Meade and his Pennsylvanians followed hard and fast--followed till they came
within easy range of the woods, among which they saw their beaten enemy
disappearing--followed still, with another cheer, and flung themselves
against the cover.

But out of those gloomy woods came, suddenly and heavily, terrible
volleys--volleys which smote, and bent and broke, in a moment, that eager
front, and hurled them swiftly back for half the distance they had won. Not
swiftly, nor in panic, any further. Closing up their shattered lines, they
came slowly away--a regiment where a brigade had been hardly a brigade where
a whole division had been victorious. They had met from the woods the first
volleys of musketry from fresh troops--had met them and returned them till
their line had yielded and gone down before the weight of fire, and till
their ammunition was exhausted.

In ten minutes the fortune of the day seemed to have changed--it was the
Rebels now who were advancing, pouring out of the woods in endless lines,
sweeping through the corn-field from which their comrades just fled. Hooker
sent in his nearest brigade to meet them, but it could not do the work. He
called for another. There was nothing close enough unless he took it from
his right. His right might be in danger if it was weakened, but his centre
was already threatened with annihilation. Not hesitating one moment, he sent
to Doubleday: "Give me your best brigade instantly."

The best brigade came down the hill to the right on the run, went through
the timber in front through a storm of shot and bursting shell and crashing
limbs, over the open field beyond, and straight into the corn field, passing
as they went the fragments of three brigadges [sic], shattered by the Rebel
fire, and streaming to the rear. They passed by Hooker, whose eyes lighted
as he saw these veteran troops led by a soldier whom he knew he could trust.
"I think they will hold it," he said.

Gen. Hartsuff took his troops very steadily but now that they were under
fire, not hurriedly, up the hill from which the corn field begins to descend
and formed them on the crest. Not a man who was not in full view--not one,
who bent before the storm. Firing at first in over the corn-field. There was
a broad interval between him and the nearest division, and he saw that if
the Rebel line were complete his own division was in immediate danger of
being flanked. But his orders were to advance, and those are orders which a
soldier--and Sedgwick is every inch a soldier--loves best to hear.

To extend his own front as far as possible, he ordered the twenty-fourth New
York to move by the left flank. The manoeuvre was attempted under a fire of
the greatest intensity; and the regiment broke. At the same moment, the
enemy perceiving their advantage, came round on the flank. Crawford was
obliged to give on the right, and his troops pouring in confusion through
the ranks of Sedgwick's advance brigade, threw it into disorder and back on
the second and third lines. The enemy advanced, their fire increasing.

General Sedgwick was three times wounded, in the shoulder, leg and wrist,
but he persisted in remaining on the field so long as there was a chance of
saving it. His Adjutant General, Major Sedewick, bravely rallying and trying
to reform the troops, was shot through the body, the bullet lodging in the
spine, and fell from his horse. Severe as the wound is, it is probably not
mortal. Lieutenant Howe, of General Sedgwick's Staff, endeavored vainly to
rally the Thirty-fourth New York. They were badly cut up and would not
stand. Half their officers were killed or wounded, their colors shot to
pieces, the Color Sergeant killed, every one of the color-guard wounded.
Only thirty-two were afterwards got together.

The Fifteenth Massachusetts went into action with 17 officers and nearly 600
men. Nine officers were killed or wounded, and some of the latter are
prisoners. Capt. Simons, Capt. Samples, of the Sharp shooters, Lieut. Darley
and Lieut. Berry are killed. Capt. Bartlett and Capt. Jocelyn, Lieut. Spurr,
Lieut. Gale and Lieut. Bradley are wounded. One hundred and thirty four men
were the only remains that could be collected of this splendid regiment.

General Dana was wounded, Gen. Howard who took command of the division after
Gen. Sedgwick was disabled, exerted himself to restore order, but it could
not be done there. Gen. Sumner ordered the line to be reformed under the
fire. The test was too severe for volunteer troops under such a fire. Sumner
himself attempted to arrest the disorder, but to little purpose.
Lieutenant-Colonel Revere and Captain Audenreid, of his staff, were wounded
severely, but not dangerously. It was impossible to hold the position.
General Sumner withdrew the division to the rear, and once more the
cornfield was abandoned to the enemy.

French sent word he could hold his ground. Richardson, while gallantly
leading a regiment under a heavy fire, was severely wounded in the shoulder.
Gen. Meagher was wounded at the head of his brigade. The loss in general
officers was becoming frightful.

At one o'clock affairs on the right had a gloomy look. Hooker's troops were
greatly exhausted, and their General away from the field. Mansfield's were
no better. Sumner's command had lost heavily, but two of his divisions were
still comparatively fresh. Artillery was yet playing vigorously in front,
though the ammunition of many of the batteries was entirely exhausted, and
they had been compelled to retire.

Doubleday held the right inflexibly. Sumner's headquarters were now in the
narrow field where the right before Hooker, had begun the fight. All that
had been gained in front had been lost! The enemy's batteries, which, if
advanced and served vigorously, might have made sad work with the
closely-massed troops, were, fortunately, either partially disabled or short
of ammunition. Sumner was confident that he could hold his own; but another
advance was out of the question. The enemy, on the other hand, seemed to be
too much exhausted to attack.

At this crises Franklin came up with fresh troops, and one division of the
corps, formed on the left. Slocum was sent forward along the slopes lying
under the first ranges of the division of Rebel hills, while Smith was
ordered to retake the cornfield and woods which all day had been so hotly
contested. It was done in the handsomest style. His Maine and Vermont
Regiments and the rest went forward on the run, and, cheering as they went,
swept like an avalanche through the cornfields, fell upon the woods, cleared
them in ten minutes, and had them. They were not again retaken.

The field and its ghastly harvest which the reaper had gathered in those
fatal hours remained finally with us. Four times it had been lost and won.
The dead are strewn so thickly that as you ride over it you cannot guide
your horse's steps too carefully. Pale and bloody faces are everywhere
upturned. They are sad and terrible, but there is nothing which makes one's
heart beat so quickly as the imploring look of sorely wounded men who beckon
wearily for help which you cannot stay to give.

General Smith's attack was so sudden that his success was accomplished with
no great loss. He had gained a point however, which compelled him to expect
every moment an attack, and to hold which, if the enemy again brought up
reserves would take his best energies and best troops. But the long strife,
the heavy losses, incessant fighting over the same repeatedly lost and won
inch by inch, and more than all, perhaps, the fear of Burnside on the left
and Porter in front, held the enemy in check. For two or three hours there
was a lull even in the cannonade on the right, which hitherto had been
incessant. McClellan had been over on the field after Sumner's repulse, but
had speedily returned to his head quarters. Sumner again sent word that he
was able to hold his position, but could not advance with his own corps.

Meantime w[h]ere was Burnside, and what was he doing? On the right w[h]ere I
had spent the day until two o'clock, little was known of the general
fortunes of the field. We had heard Porter guns in the centre, but nothing
from Burnside on the left. The distance was too great to distinguish the
sound of his artillery from Porters left. There was no immediate prospect of
more fighting on the right, and I left the field, which, all day long, had
seen the most obstinate contest of the war, and rode over to McClellan's
head-quarters. The different battle-fields were shut out from each other's
view, but all partially visible from the central hill which General
McClellan had occupied during the day. But I was more than ever impressed,
on returning with the completely deceitful appearance of the ground the
Rebels had chosen when viewed from the front.

Hooker's and Sumner's struggle had been carried on over an uneven and wooded
surface, their own line of battle extending in a semi-circle not less than a
mile and a half. Perhaps a better notion of their position can be got by
considering their right centre and left, as forming three sides of a square.
So long therefore as either wing was driven back the centre became exposed
to a very dangerous enfilading fire, and the further the centre advanced the
worse off it was, unless the lines on its side and rear were firmly held.
This formation resulted originally from the efforts of the enemy to turn
both flanks. Hooker, at the very onset, threw his column so far into the
centre of the Rebel lines that were compelled to threaten him on the flank
to secure their own centre.

Nothing of all this was perceptible from the hills in front. Some directions
of the Rebel lines had been disclosed by the stroke of their guns, but the
whole interior formation of the country beyond the hills was completely
concealed. When McClellan arranged his order of battle, it must have been
upon information, or have been left to his corps and division commanders to
discover for themselves.

Up to three o'clock Burnside had made little progress. His attack on the
bridge had been successful, but the delay had been so great that to the
observer it appeared as if McClellan's plans must have been seriously
disarranged. It is impossible not to suppose that the attacks on the right
and left were meant in a measure to correspond, for otherwise the enemy had
only to repel Hooker on the one hand, then transfer his troops and push them
against Burnside.

Here was the differences between Smith and Burnside. The former did his work
at once, and lost all his men at once--that is, all whom he lost at all;
Burnside seems to have attacked cautiously, in order to save his men, and
sending successively insufficient forces against a position of strength,
distributed his loss over a greater period of time, but yet lost none the
less in the end.

Finally, at 4 o'clock, McClellan sent simultaneously orders to Burnside and
Franklin; to the former to advance and carry the batteries in his front at
all hazards and any cost; to the latter to carry the woods next in front of
him to the left, which the Rebels still held. The order to Franklin,
however, was practically countermanded, in consequence of a message from
Gen. Sumner that, if Franklin went on and was repulsed, his own corps was
not yet sufficiently reorganized to be depended on as a reserve.

Franklin, thereupon, was directed to run no risk of losing his present
position, and, instead of sending his infantry into the woods, contented
himself with advancing his batteries over the breadth of the fields in
front, supporting them with heavy columns of infantry, and attacking with
energy the Rebel batteries immediately opposed to him. His movement was a
success so far as it went, the batteries maintaining their new ground, and
sensibly affecting the steadiness of the Rebel fire. That being once
accomplished, and all hazard of the right being a forced back having been
dispelled, the movement of Burnside became at once the turning point of
success, and the fate of the day depended on him.

How extraordinary the situation was may be judged from a moment's
consideration of the facts. It is understood that from the outset Burnside's
attack was expected to be decisive, as it certainly must have been if things
went well elsewhere, and if he succeeded in establishing himself on the
Sharpsburg road in the Rebel rear.

Gens. Hooker, Sumner and Franklin, and Mansfield, were all sent to the right
three miles away, while Porter seems to have done double duty with his
single corps in front, both supporting the batteries and holding himself in
reserve. With all this immense force on the right, but 10,000 men were given
to Burnside for the decisive moment of the day.

Still more unfortunate in its results was the total failure of these
separate attacks on the right and left to sustain, or in any manner to
co-operate with each other. Burnside hesitated for hours in front of the
bridge which should have been carried at once by a 'coup de main.' Meantime,
Hooker had been fighting for four hours with various fortune, but final
success. Sumner had come up too late to join in the decisive attack which
his earlier arrival would probably have turned into a complete success; and
Franklin reached the scence [sic] only when Sumner had been repulsed.
Probably before his arrival the Rebels had transferred a considerable number
of troops to their right to meet the attack of Burnside, the direction of
which was then suspected or developed.

Attacking first with one regiment, then with two, and delaying both for
artillery, Burnside was not over the bridge before two o'clock--perhaps not
till three. He advanced slowly up the slopes in his front, his batteries in
rear covering, to some extent, the movements of the infantry. A desperate
fight was going on in a deep ravine on his right, the Rebel batteries were
in full play, and, apparently, very annoying and destructive, while heavy
columns of Rebel troops were plainly visible, advancing, as if careless of
concealment, along the road and over the hills in the direction of
Burnside's forces. It was at this point of time that McClellan sent him the
order above given.

Burnside obeyed it most gallantly. Getting his troops well in hand, and
sending a portion of artillery to the front, he advanced them with rapidity
and the most determined vigor, straight up the hill in front, on top of
which the Rebels had maintained their most dangerous battery. The movement
was in plain view of McClellan's position, and as Franklin on the other
side, sent his batteries into the field about the same time, the battle
seemed to open in all directions with greater activity than ever.

The fight in the ravine was in full progress, the batteries which Porter
supported were firing with new vigor, Franklin was biting away on the right
and hill-top ridge and woods along the whole line was crested and veiled
with white clouds of smoke. All day had been clear and bright since the
early cloudy morning, and now this whole magnificent, unequalled [sic] scene
shone with the splendor of an afternoon September sun. Four miles of battle,
its glory all visible, its horrors all hidden, the life of the Republic
hanging on the hour--could any one be insensible of its grandeur?

There are two hills on the left of the road, the farthest and lowest. The
Rebels have batteries on both. Burnside is ordered to carry the nearest to
him, which is the farthest from the road. His guns opening first from this
new position in front, more entirely controlled and silenced the enemy's
artillery. The infantry came on at once, moving rapidly and steadily up long
dark lanes, and broad, dark recesses, being plainly visible without a glass
as they moved over the green hillside.

The next moment, the road in which the Rebel battery was planted was
canopied with clouds of dust swiftly descending into the valley. Underneath
was a tumult of wagons, guns, horses, and men flying at speed down the road.
Blue flashes of smoke burst now and then among them, a horse or a man or
half dozen went down, and then the whirl wind swept on.

The hill was carried, but could it be held? The Rebel columns, before seen
moving to the left, increased their pace. The guns, on the hill above, send
an angry tempest of shell down among Burnside's guns and men. He had formed
his columns apparently in near angles of two fields bordering the road, high
ground about them everywhere except in rear.

In another moment a Rebel battle-line appears on the brow of the ridge above
them moves swiftly down in the most perfect order and though met by
incessant discharges of musketry, of which we plainly see the flashes, does
not fire a gun. White spaces show w[h]ere men are falling, but they close up
instantly, and still the line advances. The brigades of Burnside are in
heavy column: they will not give way before a bayonet charge in line. The
Rebels think twice before they dash into these hostile masses.

There is a halt: the Rebel left gives way and scatters over the field; the
rest stand fast and fire. More infantry comes up. Burnside is outnumbered,
flanked, compelled to yield the hill he took so bravely. His position is no
longer one of attack. He defends himself with unfaltering firmness, but he
sends to McClellan for help. McClellan's glass, for the last half hour, has
seldom been turned away from the left.

He sees clearly enough that Burnside is pressed; needs no messenger to tell
him that. His face grows darker with anxious thought. Looking down into the
valley where 15,000 troops are lying, he turns a half-questioning look on
Fitz John Porter, who stands by his side gravely scanning the field. They
are Porters troops below; are fresh and only impatient to share in this
fight. But Porter slowly shakes his head, and one may believe that the same
thought is passing through the minds of both Generals. "They are the only
reserves of the army; they cannot be spared."

McClellan remounts his horse, and with Porter and a dozen officers of his
staff rides away to the left in Burnside's direction. Sykes meets them on
the road; a good soldier, whose opinion is worth taking. The three Generals
talk briefly together. It is easy to say that the moment has come when
everything may turn on one order given or withheld, when the history of the
battle is only to be written in thoughts and purposes and words of the
General.

Burnside's messenger rode up. His message is, "I want troops and guns. If
you do not send them I cannot hold my position for half an hour."
McClellan's only answer for the moment is a glance at the western sky. Then
he turns and speaks very slowly: "Tell General Burnside that this is the
battle of the war. He must hold his ground till dark at any cost. I will
send him Millers battery. I can do nothing more. I nave no infantry.

Then, as the messenger was riding away, he called him back. "Tell him if he
cannot hold his ground, the bridge, to the last! always the bridge! If the
bridge is lost, all is lost."

The sun is already down; not half an hour of daylight is left. Till
Burnside's message came it had seemed plain to every one that the battle
could not be finished to-day. None suspected how near was the peril of
defeat, of sudden attack on exhausted forces; how vital to the safety of the
army and the nation was those fifteen thousand waiting troops of Fitz John
Porter's in the hollow. But the Rebels halted instead of pushing on ; their
vindictive cannonade died away as the light faded. Before it was quite dark
the battle was over. Only a solitary gun of Burnside's thundered against the
enemy, and presently this also ceased and the field was still.

The peril came very near, but it has passed, and in spite of the peril, at
the close the day was partly a success; not a victory, but an advantage had
been gained. Hooker, Sumner and Franklin held all the ground they had
gained, and Burnside still held the bridge and his position beyond.
Everything was favorable for a renewal of the fight in the morning. If the
plan of the battle is sound there is every reason why McClellan should win
it. He may choose to postpone the battle to await his reinforcements.

The Rebels choose to retire while it is possible. Fatigue on both sides
might delay the deciding battle, yet if the enemy means to fight at all, he
cannot afford to delay. His reinforcements may be coming, but where are his
supplies? His losses are enormous. His troops have been massed in woods and
hollows, where artillery has had its most terrific effect.

Ours have been deployed and scattered. From infantry fire there is less
difference.

It is hard to estimate losses on a field of such extent, but I think ours
cannot be less than six thousand killed and wounded--it may be much greater.
Prisoners have been captured from the enemy; I hear of a regiment captured
entire, but I doubt it. All the prisoners whom I saw agree in saying that
the whole array is there. Hill and Longstreet are either killed or
prisoners.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 1, 1862, p. 4, c. 1

                        The President's Proclamation.

The great agony of the radicals is over. They clamored for a proclamation
until they succeeded. They besieged the President on all sides, and waged an
incessant war upon him for months, until at last he succumbed to the
"pressure" and issued a proclamation proclaiming unconditional freedom to
all the slaves in the seceded States after the first day of January next.
Where the President pretends to find his authority for issuing such a
proclamation, he does not deign to inform us. This new policy is to be the
great panacea for all our ills, and is to kill the rebellion at one blow. We
shall soon see the fruits of the policy and know from practical experience,
what abolition philosophy is worth. In the meantime we must be permitted to
hold the same views we have ever held on this subject, until we are
convinced to the contrary by practical results.

The conservative men of the country have been greatly disappointed in this
action of the President. They had been persuaded that he was a man of honest
intentions and desired to do what was best for his country. They hoped, even
sometimes against hope, that he would eventually see the true ground of his
position, discard the mad counsels and revolutionary teachings of the
radical men of his party, plant himself firmly upon the pillars of the
Constitution, and make an earnest effort to save the country. They caught at
every exhibition of conservatism in the President to strengthen this
opinion, and were prompt in commending and endorsing every act of his
tending to strengthen and promote the great cause in which the country is
engaged, where the abolitionists who are now in ecstacies [sic] over his
recent proclamation, either treated him with silent contempt or broke out in
open murmurs of discontent and opposition. Yet in the face of these facts
the President has given way to their clamor, and thrown himself, body and
soul, into the hands of the radical abolition faction, who have been seeking
the ruin of the country for many years, and who have pronounced the
Constitution a "league with death and a covenant with hell," and the honest
and conservative masses of the free States and the loyal Union men of the
Slave States, have been shamefully deceived, and the nation been made to
bleed afresh at every pore through the weakness and imbecility of its chief
executive officer.

A word as to the effect of this Proclamation. Practically it is not worth
the paper it is written on. If the administration is unable to enforce the
legitimate and Constitutional laws of the country, in the seceded States,
how is this unconstitutional and foolish paper proclamation to be enforced?
The President himself told the Chicago Delegation that it would be
inoperative, and could not free a single slave. The proposition is too
absurd for a moment's serious consideration.

But there is another aspect in which this subject is all important, that of
its bearing upon the loyal Union men of the slave States. They have suffered
long and much for the sacred cause of the Union in their respective States.
They persistently denied the allegations of the Secessionists that this was
war on the part of the Government for the abolition of Slavery. This was the
great argument of the Secessionists by which they were enabled to carry the
people with them. The Union men planted themselves upon the broad principles
of the Constitution, and bravely contended for the old Union and the old
flag, with danger and death oftentimes staring them in the face, trusting in
the good faith of the administration to sustain them. How have they been
sustained. Alas! how! President Lincoln, with one stroke of the pen,
violates the plighted faith of the Government, and says to the whole
southern people, that the Union men were wrong and the Secessionists were
right. In no other way could Abraham Lincoln have done so much to strengthen
and consolidate the rebellion. We have no doubt that Jefferson Davis would
have given the last dollar in the Confederate Treasury to have just such a
proclamation emanate from the President of the United States.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 1, 1862, p. 4, c. 4

               Correspondence From "the Army of the Potomac."

Correspondence of the Valley Spirit.

                                                  Camp Near Sharpsburg, MD.
                                                      September 27th, 1862.

Messrs. Editors: For some inexplicable reason, masterly inactivity again
seems to rule the hour. Our vast army is still lying on this side of the
Potomac, seemingly resting on the laurels so nobly won last week. The right
wing now rests at Williamsport, while the left runs as far up as Harper's
Ferry. General Fitz John Porter's corps of which we form a part now holds
the centre. Of course we have no more idea of the cause of the delay than
you have, though speculations and rumors are rife. A recent reconnoisance
[sic] across the river developed the fact that there is no considerable
force of the enemy for several miles into the interior; though it is now
ascertained that a large body did advance towards the river, about the
middle of the week; where they have gone, no one seems to know.

Opposite Williamsport, it is said, the enemy are in force. Their pickets are
plainly seen from the Maryland shore. What the near future will develope
[sic] it is impossible even to conjecture. It is intimated, occassionally
[sic], by the "higher powers," that another invasion of Maryland is even
expected, which is to prove far more formidable than the first; but this may
be merely to stimulate the men to more vigilance on their picket posts or
more promptness in the discharge of their duties. Of one fact there can be
but little doubt, that whoever will take the aggressive, another desperate
battle must be fought, in this vicinity before winter sets in; and on the
issue of this battle the speedy termination or prolongation of the war most
undoubtedly depends.

I regret to announce that the effort to secure the reinstatement of Major
Austin has failed; and justice compels me to say that this is a particularly
hard case, as will be seen by the ensuing statement, voluntarily submitted
to the War Department, by Brig. Gen'l Tyler and the field and line officers
of the regiment.

The following is submitted as an impartial statement of the facts in regard
to so much of General Order, No. 125, as relates to the dismissal of Major
James C. Austin, of the 126th Regiment, Pennsylvania Volunteers, from the
service of the United States.

On the 28th day of August last, Major Austin received a certificate from the
Surgeon of the Regiment, setting forth that owing to serious illness he was
rendered temporarily unfit for duty, and that his condition demanded a
removal from camp. This certificate was based upon an application for leave
of absence, which was approved by both Col Elder commanding the Regiment and
Brigadier General Tyler commanding the Brigade.

On the day following, he proceeded to Washington, D.C., to obtain the
further approval of the War Department. On account of some informality in
the application, this was withheld, but no such decision was made known to
Major Austin until his disease had assumed such increased violence as to
make his immediate return to his post a physical impossibility. This fact he
immediately communicated to Elder and Gen. Tyler, and remained in Washington
under medical treatment until the 3d of September, following, when he
promptly returned to duty.

His extreme illness not only justified him in this, but the fact that the
General Order, No.--"prohibiting officers from visiting Washington," had not
been published in his Regiment, completely vindicates him from the charge of
absence without leave, knowingly and intentionally, implied in the order
publishing his dismissal.

Such are the facts of this case as they have come to the knowledge of the
undersigned, who will cheerfully bare testimony to the strict attention Maj.
Austin has given to his duties, since his entrance into the service, and who
honestly believe that to enforce the order of his dismissal will work great
injustice to a good soldier and loyal man.

(Signed)
 E.B. Tyler, Brigadier General,
 Jas. G. Elder,                Colonel,      126 Reg., P.V.,
 D.W. Rowe,                    Lieut. Col.,  "
 S.J. Niccols,                 Chaplain,     "
 J. Stewart,                   Adjutant,     "
 John Doebler,                 Captain,      "
 W.H. Davison,                 "             "
 R.S. Brownson,                "             "
 W.W. Walker,                  "             "
 J.H. Reed,                    "             "
 John P. Wharton,              "             "
 Gen. L. Miles,                "             "
 John H. Walker,               "             "
 A.H. Martin,                  "             "
 A.R. Davision,                "             "

Lieut. Geo. W. Welsh has been promoted to the first lieutenancy of Company
A; and William McLenegan has just been commissioned, by the Governor, second
lieutenant in the same company.

Privates John Oaks, Jas. R. Gilmore, Sam'l S. Shryock, Geo. W. Watson and
Thos. Lee of Company A; Brinton of Company D; and Hollar and Parker of
Company K. have been detailed to the Provost Guard at General Porter's Head
Quarters. They are now located about half a mile from us. Their address for
the present is: "Care provost Marshal, Gen'l F. J. Porter's HeadQuarters,
Fifth Army Corps, Army of Potomac, Washington, D.C."

The only excitement we have now, to break the monotony of camp life, is
picket duty, and occasionally it is exciting enough for all practical
purposes. The other night when company A was out, when all was as still as
death, a bomb exploded in our immediate vicinity, or a round shot was fired
over our heads. We were upon the river bank, and you may well imagine it
occasioned no little excitement. Every one remained very quietly at his
post, not knowing what moment the next shot would be fired, or where it
might choose to strike. As we saw no flash, however, or heard no report from
the opposite shore, we concluded the report must have been occasioned by the
accidental explosion of an old shell in the woods to our rear, as also the
scarred trees in the vicinity would seem to indicate. Perhaps some of our
Franklin County friends have had a little experience in "picketing" at home.
But there is a vast difference between the performance of that duty at
Marion or New Franklin, and its faithful discharge along the borders of the
enemy's country. For several days there was considerable firing between the
pickets of the hostile armies, but it has now been stopped by mutual
consent. Yet there is no telling what wiles the foe will resort to.
Consequently every one watches, with the most intense anxiety, every
movement of a bush or bramble; the slightest unusual sound falls upon his
ear like some alarm bell. "Do you hear that noise?" "Listen, it comes
nearer." Yes, the rustling of the bushes comes nearer and nearer. "Halt! who
comes there!" All is silent! Then again comes still nearer the rustling of
the bushes on the river bank. Again, "Halt," and this time "click" goes the
musket locks, when peering into the underbrush, a pair of horns and a cow's
head is distinctly visible. "That came pretty nearly being a dead cow;"
"Well it did;" and then all is quiet for the next hour. Then comes the tread
of footsteps, heard distinctly, and more distinctly every moment. You hear
the "halt" of your next neighbor, and a few words in an undertone, and on
comes the footsteps; soon the bushes, a few paces distant, open and a file
of armed men appear. "Halt! who comes there?" Then comes the welcome word
"Relief." "Advance, Sergeant of the relief, with the counter sign." The
sergeant approaches, gives the countersign, in a low tone, over the point of
the guard's bayonet, and then the relief takes your place and you fall into
the rear and return to your bivouac for four hours sleep, when your turns
comes round again for another tiresome and exciting two hours watch. Such
are a few of the incidents attending the most unpleasant and dangerous duty
the soldier has to perform.

It becomes the sad duty of your correspondent to record the first death
which has yet occurred in our regiment--that of Sergt. David E. Carson, of
Mercersburg, who died, of Typhoid fever, after a brief illness, at the
residence of his brother, W.K. Carson, in Baltimore city, on the 13th inst.
He was a member of company C, (Capt. Brownson's) and, being very unwell, was
left in Baltimore, when we passed through. His disease soon assumed a
violent type, and he never left his bed after his arrival in Baltimore. He
leaves a widow and three small children, and a large circle of relatives and
friends to mourn his loss. The following just and sincere tribute of respect
has been paid him by his immediate companions in arms:

                                       Camp Antietam, Near Sharpsburg, MD.,
                                                      September 27th, 1862.

At an adjourned meeting of the Mercersburg Guards, Co. C, 126th Regiment,
Penna. Vols., held at the above time and place. In relation to the death of
our fellow member, Sergeant David E. Carson, the following preamble and
resolutions were adopted:

WHEREAS, It has pleased an allwise Providence to remove from our midst our
esteemed fellow-member, Sergt. David E. Carson, whose association, during
the short time he was with us, was that of unity and pleasure, therefore.

Resolved.That in the decease of Sergt. David E. Caison, we have lost a true
friend to the cause in which we are engaged; the country has been deprived
of the services of a true and faithful soldier, and his family and friends,
a loving husband, an indulgent father, a dutiful son, a kind brother and a
true friend.

Resolved. That we deeply sympathize and condole the family and friends of
the deceased in their bereavement; and that a copy of these resolutions be
sent to the family; and that they be published in the Good Intent, Valley
Spirit, and Repository and Transcript.

                                            Capt. R. S. Brownson, Chairman.
                                                 Sergt. Jas. P. McCullough.
                                                    Sergt. Thos D. Metcalf.
                                                      Corp. David G. Coyle.
                                                    Private Jno. Q.A. Orth.

Good Intent and Transcript will please copy, by request of the Committee.

Crowds of Franklin County friends still continue to visit us daily, as a
general thing bringing loads of provisions with them, which have not
contributed very much to the health of the regiment. We have not been
accustomed to good living lately, and, with such an abundance of the good
things of this life, together with our damp and cold nights and foggy
mornings, our hospital is full to overflowing. We have now but eight hundred
and fifty men fit for duty, in the regiment. Those who send provisions to
the army should confine their hospitality to bread, butter, ham and the
substantials--vegetables too are in great demand, but keep your sweetmeats
at home--they do much more harm than good.

                                                                         K.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 1, 1862, p. 5, c. 1

                                The Invasion.

Our town has again resumed its unusual quiet and everything once more moves
on as if nothing had occurred to disturb or alarm our community. The
military called here to defend the State from invasion, have all returned to
their homes, and we hope it may be long before their services may be again
needed for the same purpose. The only tangible evidence of the vicinity of
hostile armies and battle fields, in the number of sick and wounded soldiers
in the hospitals, lately established here. We understand that there are
about four hundred patients in the three hospitals. We can say, from
personal observation, that they are well attended by the Surgeons in charge,
and everything that the kindness of our citizens can suggest, is cheerfully
furnished to render their situation comfortable.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 8, 1862, p. 1, c. 1

                               Correspondence.

Correspondence of "Spirit and Times."

                                                  Camp Near Sharpsburg, Md.
                                                         October 4th, 1862.

Messrs Editors: An interesting ceremony transpired in camp on Wednesday
last, consisting of the presentation of a stand of colors to Company "E."
(Capt. W. W. Walker's) by the ladies of Waynesboro, quite a number of whom
were present on the occasion. The Presentation Speech was made by Hon.
Edward McPherson, who spoke in substance as follows:

Officers and Men of Company "E," 126th Regiment Penna., Vols: It has been
made my welcome duty, by the Ladies of Washington Township, a delegation of
whom are here to enliven this occasion, to present you a beautiful Stand of
Colors, in token of their personal regard and the lively interest they feel
in the glorious cause in which you are enlisted.

Soldiers! You have volunteered in the army of the Union! You have grave
duties before you. The honor of the community from which you come, the honor
of the State you represent, are in a great measure, reposed in your hands.
The safety and honor of the Republic is to be tested on the coming fields of
battle. The problem of the nations existence is there to be solved. On those
bloody fields, if you are permitted to do so, you are to carry this flag.
Let it never be dishonored. Let it never be trailed in the dust. It is in
itself a beautiful flag--bearing on converse sides the arms of the Union and
the arms of Pennsylvania--the Nation and the Keystone of the Federal Arch,
forming a grand combination; and more than this, it comes from those who
will watch your advancing footsteps with breathless anxiety, and who will
pray for your safety with earnest hearts.

You are portion of a "grand army" of Pennsylvania; and you and we will have
cause to be proud of our State. The grand outpouring of her hundreds of
thousands has astonished the nation and made its enemies quail.

Take this flag; bear it in front of your columns; and when you return home,
as God grant you may, bring it back with you and let it be cherished and
preserved, and handed down to posterity, as a valuable relic.

Lieut. Colonel Rowe responded on behalf of the Company: Sir--Company "E"
have delegated me to thank you, and though you the Ladies of Waynesboro, for
the present they have made us. This flag has been presented from Waynesboro.
That name calls up a thousand pleasant recollections! It comes from home.
That word alone would be sufficient to recommend it to our care and
guardsmanship. It comes from a place called after the immortal revolutionary
hero "Mad Anthony," and his noble example will teach us that, having gone
forth to battle for liberty and right, we must do or die. Its presentation
to day seems to revive the days of chivalry. With this flag at its head,
Company "E" will go forth, to battle not only for the honor of the state and
nation, but also for the honor of its lady loves.

The ladies of Waynesboro have always been formest [sic] in their works of
benevolence and of patriotism. They have furnished invaluable aid to the
Sanitary commission--and food and conveniences and delicacies to the sick.
As their last act of patriotism they present this flag; and on our part we
pledge our lives that it shall be brought back from the wars, if not with
honor, at least without dishonor. Company E, is the color company. Its
members came to fight for the honor of the nation's flag, and although this
is a company flag, it is still the Stars and Stripes.

We take this flag, with grateful acknowledgments, and when we return home,
how proudly will it wave, as we march through your streets! We will then be
again at our homes with your approving faces around us, and we will bear
that flag through your midst without a blush of shame.

We had a grand review, on Friday, by President Lincoln, Generals McClellan
and Porter, and a number of other military celebrities. Our Division and
those in our immediate vicinity were ordered under arms about nine o'clock
in the morning, and there they lay under a broiling hot sun, until between
one and two in the afternoon, when the customary salute, twenty-one guns,
fired by the division next below us, announced the approach of the
Presidential party. The President, in citizen's dress, rode a black charger
(a remarkably hard trotter, by the way, of which fact "father Abraham"
seemed painfully conscious); on his right, rode General Humphreys, Division
Commander. They were followed by Generals McClellan and Fitz John Porter,
riding side by side, the remainder of the party following in double file.
They simply rode in front of the different regiments, the men being at a
"present," the drum corps discoursing their very choicest, the officers
saluting, and the colors drooping, as they passed. The President seemed much
fatigued, and had no doubt been engaged in the same occupation since early
in the morning, and had several hours' more hard riding and reviewing before
him, before the day closed. The general impression seems to be that this
tour of inspection of the President's looks to an immediate forward
movement. Two facts he has no doubt had impressed upon his mind--that the
army is anxious to move at once, and that General McClellan, above all
others, possesses its confidence. The President must have had in view some
such object as is above indicated, for he is not the man to travel around,
at so much inconvenience and loss of time, merely for a little glory and
display. One thing is certain, we have generally had good results from Mr.
Lincoln's visits to the army; it does him good, occasionally, to cut loose
from the politicians and have a few days' honest chat with the soldiers.

On Friday, company A captured, or perhaps I should say found a magnificent
twelve pound Parrot gun, which had been buried by the retreating rebels in a
field near our camp. Corporal Emanuel Forney happened to be crossing this
field and discovered what he supposed to be portion of a shell or round
shot. On kicking it with his foot, he soon discovered it to be the knob on
the breach of a large cannon. Our little friend is somewhat excitable, and
withal a great humorist; so you may imagine he cut some strange antics. He
summoned some of company A to his assistance, and they soon exhumed the rich
prize, and carried it to head quarters, where there was great exultation
over the "capture." This is the first of the enemy's cannon company "A" have
taken, and the boys say they are determined it shall not be the the [sic]
last. Since the discovery there has been a perfect furore after buried
canon, and the neighboring fields stand a good prospect of being dug down
all over to the distance of several feet. It is reported that several
soldiers have already by reason of scarcity of spades and picks, worn away
their nails to the quicks. it is astonishing how reports become exaggerated.
The first rumor your correspondent heard of the cannon finding, was to the
effect that "Mawny Forney had found six twelve pound Parrott guns, and had
just carried them all into camp." The corporal, it will be remembered, is
five feet two, and weights something near a hundred. The report did sound
rather improbable, but as Forney is capable of almost anything, we followed
the crowd and soon learned the true state of the case.

Abraham Huber and J. Henry Hutton of Co. A, J.G. Lindsay of company D
and--Cleverstone of company G, who were left at the Hospitals in Washington,
and afterwards sent to the "Convalescent Camp," in Virginia, have again
reached the regiment, in good health. They all speak of this "Convalescent
Camp" as a wretched place. There are about eighteen thousand men there, of
whom scarcely the slightest care is taken. A late Washington paper says:
"Language is inadequate to portray the miserable, filthy, neglected and
starving condition of these men. Those who visit here are compelled to
exclaim, "can it be possible that these are human beings to be thus treated,
in a christian land, by a nation professing christianity." It is sincerely
to be hoped that the proper authorities will give this matter their
immediate and earnest attention.

I have heretofore made it a rule, and shall continue to observe it in
future, not to refer to those who have been sent to the Hospital, for the
reason that this is frequently done for but slight illness, and a notice of
the fact might cause much needless anxiety among friends at home. Cases of
serious illness or accident however, I will notice.

There are a number of sick and wounded rebel prisoners in the hospitals near
camp. Many of them talk very fairly, and are anxious to see the war closed
on any terms; but some are still vindictive in the extreme and laugh at all
idea of the South returning to her allegiance. They all seemed very
a[n]xious to see McClellan, the other day; and several of them stated that
his ability was fully conceded in the Southern army. The mortality among
them is very great; from the one hospital, in our camp, from three to six
are buried daily; and in all there were scarcely more than fifty there, when
we came. The government provides for all their wants; but their own men,
left in charge, seem to take poor care of them. They are interred in an
adjoining field, and small wooden head boards are placed to their graves,
bearing their names.

The Railroad bridge at Harpers Ferry is completed; the first train crossed
it to-day. we will now be able to establish a basis for supplies on the
Virginia shore, as soon as we make our advance.

A few days since, I paid a visit to the Reserves and the 107th. They lay on
our right, about three miles distant. They have suffered severely in the
late engagements. The 107th made a most gallant charge at the battle of
South Mountain, and was highly complimented on the field, by Gen. Durvea. As
it charged up the mountain, the General sat upon his horse, and turning to
some New York Regiments, spoke at the top of his voice: "Look at those
gallant Pennsylvanians! They are brave boys! Their State may well be proud
of them! Now, New York, do your duty!" During this charge, the 107th passed
the Reserves, who had expended all their ammunition. The reserves sat up a
tremendous cheer, and the enemy thinking at least ten thousand men were
charging upon them, broke and ran and were driven by at least two miles by
the "gallant Pennsylvanians!"

A member of the Regular Cavalry, not a citizen of our State, remarked to me,
the other day, that Pennsylvanians had fought well before, but, since the
threatened invasion of their State, they had done as much execution as if
fifty thousand more men had been added to their ranks. But their reputation
has been dearly bought, as many a sad fire-side circle will testify.

Capt. W. W. Walker has been ordered to report to the Provost Marshal of
Pennsylvania, and to arrest all deserters from this Division, who may be
found. He will have plenty of work to do in Franklin county. We have already
lost heavily by desertion.

                                                                         K.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 8, 1862, p. 1, c. 3

                         From the Army in Kentucky.

                                           Louisville, Ky., Sept. 29, 1862.

Messrs. Editors Spirit and Times:--I had the pleasure a short time ago to
get my hands on the Transcript, which one of my messmates received and was
amused to see an account of the "Union" County Convention of delegates for
nominating county officers. I should not have noticed the meeting if it had
not been styled the "Union Party" of old Franklin. I think I can prove that
some of the delegates are only Union as far as talk goes. Last summer while
I was at home, my friends had the pleasure (if pleasure it was) of hearing
me spoken of as a d----d Secesh; for no other reason than attending the
Democratic County Convention, and giving the radical Republicans a hearing
whenever I got a chance. Last summer, when the boys, in Sulphur Spring
district, were trying to raise a squad of men to go to Harrisburg to enlist,
one of the delegates to the above named "Union" Convention, got very cross
at them for trying to persuade his boys to enlist. Another of the delegates
went along to Harrisburg. After laying around and boarding a few days on U.
Sam, he went back, taking a few of the hardest crackers he could find with
him, which he carried about as a show. Now, I think it is hard when such men
represent the "Union" sentiment of the county, and those who fight for the
Union, but do not exactly coincide with the Administration, are styled
Secessionists.

                                                                 A Soldier.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 8, 1862, p. 4, c. 2

                                The Election.

We would call upon every Democrat in the county to consider well the
importance of the approaching election. It is, in our opinion, the most
important one that has occurred in the history our country. The baneful
spirit of Abolitionism has been let loose upon the land, and unless crushed
by the mighty power of the Democracy at the polls, will most inevitably
prostrate the rights and liberties of the white man in a vain attempt to
elevate the black. Democrats, we warn you to be vigilant and active. Your
country needs your services. Upon you depends the safety of our beloved
country. Abolitionism threatens the overthrow of the Constitution, the
disruption of the Union and the elevation of the negro to an equality with
the white man. This is not only a contest for civil and political rights but
also to maintain the social and political supremacy of the white race over
the black. Let not therefore the excitement occasioned by the war, withdraw
your attention from the importance of the approaching election. Whilst the
army of the Republic is crushing out Secessionism in the field, do not
forget that you have a duty to perform by voting down Abolitionism at the
Polls.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 8, 1862, p. 5, c. 1

                          Unreasonable Complaints.

Since the return to their homes of the Militia, who were ordered to this
section of our State, to resist an invasion of the soil of Pennsylvania by
the Rebels under Lee and Jackson, we have noticed, in several of our
exchanges, charges of inhospitable treatment made against our citizens.

These complaints are entirely uncalled for and unjust. Ever since the
breaking out of the rebellion the people of our town, rich and poor, have
vied with each other in their efforts to minister to the comfort of the
soldiers passing through the town. Not a car-load of men in uniform could
pass through, but they were surrounded with men, women and children with
baskets filled with provisions to relieve their hunger. Not a sick or
wounded soldier entered the borough but was taken by the hand and his
necessities relieved. Money and time were lavished without stint, their
houses thrown open and their beds surrendered to the noble men who were
fighting the battles of our country. To some extent, they have had their
reward for these self-sacrificing acts of kindness and charity, be feeling
better about the region of their hearts, and in hearing the warm "God bless
you" of the war worn veteran as he limped forth from their hospitable doors.
Even now the Hospitals in our midst are thronged with the wives, mothers and
daughters of our citizens, smoothing the pillows of the sick and wounded,
and lightening to some extent the long hours of sickness and pain.

Yet notwithstanding all our people have done and are doing, they are charged
with a lack of hospitality by a portion of the Pennsylvania Militia who were
ordered here, as they say, "to defend the property of the people of this
portion of the Cumberland Valley." We would like to know if these men, were
ordered here for the purpose of protecting our property alone, or whether
they were not protecting their own homes as well, by advancing to the Border
of the State and even into the State of Maryland. It would indeed have been
a Herculean task for our citizens to have entertained and fed some thirty
thousand men, if even it had been necessary; but as no such necessity
existed, inasmuch as the State Authorities had made ample provision for
their subsistence, it was asking a little too much to expect our citizens to
provide delicacies for so numerous a company. In fact they never dreamed
that these men came here to feast, but to meet the foe in battle and drive
him back.

A word or two in relation to the "protection" given to property here. The
farmers living along the [Ha]gerstown road dread, but little more, the
advent of a Rebel army--as far as the destruction of property is
concerned--than another advance of the Pennsylvania Militia. Fences burned
for fuel, young timber wantonly destroyed, whole fields of growing corn cut
down and carried away, and numberless other vandalisms attest the kind of
"protection" their property received.

We cannot but admire and applaud, the patriotism that prompted these men to
leave their homes for the purpose of repelling the Rebel hordes from
Pennsylvania soil, yet at the same time, we must be permitted to denounce
the conduct of some of them who say they came to save property, but instead
wantonly destroyed it.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 15, 1862, p. 1, c. 1

                       The Emancipation Proclamation.

                   General Order Issued by Gen. McClellan.

                           General Order No. 163.

Head-Quarters Army of the Potomac, Camp near Sharpsburg, October 7.--The
attention of the officers and soldiers of the Army of the Potomac is called
to General Order No. 132, War Department, September 29th, 1862, publishing
to the army the President's proclamation of September 22d.

A proclamation of such grave moment to the nation, officially communicated
to the army, affords the General Commanding an opportunity of defining
specifically to the officers and soldiers under his command, the relation
borne by all persons in the military service of the United States towards
the civil authorities of the Government.

The Constitution confides to the civil authorities legislative, judicial and
executive powers, and the duty of asking, expounding and executing the
Federal laws. Armed forces are raised and supported simply to sustain the
civil authorities, and are to be held in strict subordination thereto in all
respects. This fundamental rule of our political system is essential to the
security of our Republican institutions, and should be thoroughly understood
and observed by every soldier.

The principle upon which, and the objects for which armies shall be employed
in suppressing Rebellion, must be determined and declared by the civil
authorities, and the Chief Executive, who is charged with the administration
of the national affairs, is the proper and only source through which the
views and orders of the Government can be made known to the armies of the
nation.

Discussions by officers and soldiers concerning public measures determined
upon and declared by the Government, when carried out beyond the ordinary
temperate and respectful expression of opinion, tend greatly to impair and
destroy the discipline and efficiency of the troops by substituting the
spirit of political faction for that firm, steady and earnest support of the
authority of the Government which is the inherent duty of the American
soldier.

The remedy for political errors, if any are committed, is to be found only
in the action of the people at the polls. In thus calling the attention of
this army to the true relation between the soldiers and the Government, the
General Commanding merely adverts to an evil against which it has been
thought advisable during our whole history to guard the armies of the
Republic, and in so doing he will not be considered by any right minded
person as casting any reflection upon that loyalty and good conduct which
has been so fully illustrated upon so many battle-fields.

In carrying out all measures of public policy this army will, of course, be
guided by the same rules of mercy and Christianity that have ever controlled
its conduct towards the defenceless.

                                     By command of Major General McClellan.
                                                           James A. Hardie.
                                   Lieut. Col. A.D.C., A. Assist. Adj. Gen.

This general order, says the Constitutional Union, is characteristic of the
gallant man who issued it. It assumes no dictatorial tone; but, in
temperate, respectful and conciliatory language, counsels--not
orders--submission; and deprecates discussions which might possibly impair
and destroy the discipline and efficiency of the troops. It also points to
the remedy!

"The remedy for political errors," (says the order) "if any are committed,
is to be found only in the action of the people at the polls." Well said,
noble "Little Mac!" That is the remedy, and the people are about to apply it
to the wounds which have been inflicted upon our country, our Constitution
and our laws. God be thanked, that while Abolition zealots would deny free
speech--imprison without cause and without hearing--set truth and justice at
defiance, that there is yet a remedy left us. The people yet remain. The
glorious privilege of the right of suffrage is, for a while at least,
guaranteed us, and that privilege will be exercised in its fullest, broadest
and most significant sense on Tuesday next. Prudential reasons may properly
draw forth General McClellan's order No. 163, and prudential reasons will
draw forth thousands on Tuesday next to vindicate the laws and the
Constitution of the Union.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 15, 1862, p. 1, c. 2

                   Abolitionism Against White Working Men.

We find the following correspondence between E.M. Stanton, Secretary of War,
and Brigadier General Tuttle, commanding the Federal forces at Cairo, Ill.,
in the Western papers. It is highly important to white men:

                                                 Cairo, September 18, 1862.

To Hon. E.M. Stanton, Sec'y of War, Wash'ton:

General Grant is sending here a large lot of negro women and children, and
directs me to ask you what to do with them. Parties in Chicago and other
cities wish them for servants. Will I be allowed to turn them over to
responsible committees to be so employed? If so can I transport them at
Government expense?

                                                               J.M. Tuttle.
                               Brig. General, Commanding District of Cairo.
                                                 Washington, Sept 18, 1862.

To Brigadier General Tuttle, Commanding:

You are authorized to turn over to responsible committees negro women and
children who shall take them in charge and provide them with employment and
support in the Northern States, and you may furnish transportation at
Government expense.

                                                          Edwin M. Stanton,
                                                          Secretary of War.

This black labor movement of the Abolition-Republican party should arrest
the attention of white laborers in the North. That they are in earnest
cannot be doubted. If not, why should Secretary Stanton send negroes to the
North at the expense of the Government; or the Reverend Dr. Tyng and his
Abolition associates propose to hold meetings in aid of the scheme? They
mean to antagonize white labor with cheap negro labor from the South, and if
white men are opposed to this movement they must act in concert at the
polls. There only an they put a stop to this wicked plot against the
laboring men of the Northern States. If the Abolition Republican party have
control of the next Congress, they will bend all their legislation in favor
of negro labor, and in opposition to the interests of white men. The
question now is, 'black against white labor.' The Abolition Republican party
has openly declared in favor of black labor, and white men must defeat them
at the polls by voting for the Democratic party which is in favor of the
Union, the Constitution, and the interested white men.--Fulton Democrat.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 15, 1862, p. 5, c. 1

                               The Rebel Raid.

On Friday evening last, our citizens were much surprised and considerably
excited by reports of the advance of a large force of Rebel Cavalry by way
of Mercersburg. Men arrived on horseback who had been hotly pursued by them
to within three or four miles of Town.

About 7 o'clock a company of them appeared in the Public Square carrying a
flag of truce and demanding a surrender of the place. No military force
being here, able to resist, the town was surrendered on the terms that
private property would be respected and citizens be unmolested. They then
took full possession of the place, and on the next morning took their
departure to the direction of Gettysburg leaving a guard to fire the Depot
buildings. The Depot House, the Machine Shops and the Warehouses of the
Messrs Wunderlich and Nead were entirely consumed with a considerable amount
of Government stores and other property. The Rebel force numbered about 1500
Cavalry and Artillery under Generals Stuart and Hampton. They have stolen
about 1000 Horses in this County, but from last reports and the preparations
made for their capture, we feel confident that the whole force will be
captured and the stolen property recovered.

We are hurried in getting to Press and can give no extended notice of this
humiliating Rebel invasion of Pennsylvania soil.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 1, c. 1

                             A Trip to Richmond.

                     By Lieut. D.R.B. Nevin, 109th F.V.

It was always predicted by those conversant with military tactics, science
and strategy, that "Pope's men would be in Richmond before McClellan's." The
latter's movements, were said to have been tardy and phlegmatic, while those
of the former were animated, spirited, bold and dashing.

Pope's flaming manifesto on assuming command of the noble "Army of
Virginia," indicated a vigorous policy, and a determination to be satisfied
with nothing less than a full view of ten thousand rebel backs, borne by
twenty thousand rebel legs in full retreat, every morning before breakfast.
This was a very fine programme, and it was successfully carried out in every
particular save one 'slight variation.' It was, this, (and it is so trivial
and unimportant as hardly to be worth recording), instead of seeing the
enemy's backs, the enemy invariably saw Pope's. The worse luck Pope had, the
more newspaper correspondents he lustily cried for, until it was unanimously
conceded on all hands, that if he was furnished with a good strong
regulation sword, a fast horse, and a brace of reliable telegraph operators.
Major General John Pope could demolish more rebels in a given time than any
other man in the Army. Heaven protect the Sioux's from his fearful sword!
Again, while Banks was trifling away his time about Warrenton, and Siegel
and McClellan were securing new bases and groping around in the dark,
ninety-seven officers of Pope's command were quietly and unostentatiously
marching into Richmond. In that memorable march no man was insulted and
private property was duly respected. For his invaluable services, the
Administration which is always quick to perceive and ready to execute,
promoted the redoubtable Major General to the position of St. Paul's, which
is higher up than any other officer has been advanced since the beginning of
this very wicked rebellion.

The battle of Cedar, or Slaughter's Mountain as it is sometimes called, was
the initiatory step of Jackson's march into Maryland, and threatened raid
into Pennsylvania. It was rapidly followed up by a succession of rebel
victories at Carlett's Station, Manassas, and Bull Run number two. The
progress of the enemy's forces was promptly checked at the battle of
Antietam w[h]ere our brave troops won fresh laurels, and drove the ruthless
invaders back to their own blood stained and unholy soil.

The battle of Slaughter's Mountain was a huge mistake--a mammoth military
blunder. Government saw it, and rectified it as far as was within its powers
by the removal of the originator of it. I will not attempt a description of
that battle, but simply state, that it was acknowledged by the rebel press
of Richmond to have been the hardest contested engagement that had taken
place since the commencement of the present war. The losses on each side
were about equal. About seven o'clock in the evening I was captured by a
pair of young men attached to the cavalry company of the late distinguished
Col. Turner Ashby. A few moments after my arrest, I was brought before
General Jackson, who treated me kindly, and quickly asked me some short,
pointed questions in relation to the strength of Federal forces, and what
"corps" were engaged on our side in the contest. My replies, were not of the
most satisfactory character and the General quickly rode away, leaving me in
charge of the Colonel of the 33rd Virginia. I was soon relieved of my sword,
sash, and revolver, and in company with about ninety other unfortunate
fellow citizens, consigned to the mercies of a fierce looking Sergeant with
a very heavy guard under his control. About two hours after my capture the
sound of heavy artillery announced that our Batteries had renewed the
battle, and courted a reply from the enemy. Our guns happened to have the
exact range of the camp where we were, which was the old battle field of the
afternoon, and for a time caused great consternation, and sad havoc among
the enemy. The shrieking hissing shells flew thick and fast around us, until
the clarion voice of Jackson ordered us to fall back which was done
promptly, and very much to my own personal satisfaction I assure you. After
receding about a mile, a halt was ordered, and in five minutes after the
command I was soundly asleep in the middle of a large wheat field, perfectly
exhausted by the severe forced marches of the last three days, and the
terrible excitement of the afternoon's battle. The mental anxiety caused by
the stirring scenes of the bloody conflict developed itself during the night
by many of my comrades gasping, groaning, and utterly wild incoherent
sentences and exclamations.

When I awoke in the morning, the bright clear sunlight was shining on my
face, and the ragged confederate guards were pacing slowly around the group
of captives. It was a lovely holy Sabbath morning and all surrounding nature
seemed so sweet and calm and tranquil, as to exclude for a moment all
visions and reflections of grim visaged War. Our Sergeant promptly ordered
us to "fall in," and in a short time we were on our road to Orange Court
House, en route to Richmond. We passed over the battle field as we moved
slowly along, and such a sickening sight I never wish to gaze upon again.
Headless bodies! dismembered shattered limbs scattered in every direction
gave evidence of the fierceness of the struggle and the terrific accuracy of
our artillery firing. In one place, hundreds of dead bodies were piled up
like cord wood. As we moved further on, we found the enemy removing their
wounded as speedily as they could to the rear, in expectancy of a renewal of
the fight. Regiments were advancing quickly under the immediate supervision
of the ubiquitous and indefatigable Jackson who was calm, cool and
apparently hopeful of success. I had a fine close view of "old Stonewall" in
the morning as he hurried to and fro with a commendable systematic energy in
his every move, action, and command. His dress was plain, and unassuming,
and his general bearing unsoldier like. He wore gray homespun pantaloons, a
dark jean hunting shirt, and a light cross-barred summer cap and rode a
small sized but keen-looking bay horse. As is well known he is the idol of
the Virginia branch of the Confederate Army. Great complaint is however
frequently made on account of his marching his command too much and too
rapidly.

In advancing on our journey, we found the main and side roads crowded with
tens of thousands of rebel raggamuffins [sic], pressing eagerly forward to
reinforce Jackson. As we passed them they made but few remarks concerning
us, although occasionally some rude fellow ignorant alike of the rules of
civilized warfare and common decency, would perpetrate a coarse joke at our
expense. This army was part of the same which was punished by our forces
subsequently at South Mountain and Antietam and as I saw their serried ranks
moving onward I predicted in my own mind that as they had now passed the
Rubicon in the discomfiture of Pope, it would require almost superhuman
force to keep them from pressing into Pennsylvania. Had they succeeded, the
border counties of our State would have suffered worse than did the
beautiful valleys of the Rhine from the huge armies of Louis XIV at the
close of the Seventeenth Century, houses burned, crops ruined, churches
desecrated, and women and children outraged and insulted.

A march of ten miles brought us to Orange Court House which is an old
fashioned, but rather thrifty comfortable looking county town of about two
thousand population. We were placed in the yard fronting the country
building, and surrounded by a heavy guard. At 7 o'clock P.M. we were
furnished by our captors with some original 'Jeff Davis crackers' as they
were called, which were, if such a thing is possible harder and more
unseemly than our own Federal army crackers. This was the first morsel I had
to eat since four hours before the fight commenced on the previous day, and
the crackers did indeed taste delicious. After sleeping in the open yard all
night unprotected by any covering, we started in the morning to the depot to
await the arrival of the cars which were to convey us to Richmond. Presently
the train hove, in sight, consisting of twenty-one cars, filled with the
dead and wounded. This sight, appeared to incense the miscellaneous crowd at
the depot against us, and it would have required but little to have raised a
mob which would have disposed of us very summarily. The commissioned officer
who had charge of us, acted in a very manly way, and silenced the crowd by
swearing roundly and loudly that he would shoot down the first man who dared
to raise a hand against any prisoner under his charge. The crowd roared out
for a time that by Jeff Davis's late proclamation we were not prisoners of
war and would be 'strung up' anyhow as soon as we reached Richmond, and that
by hanging us on the spot transportation might be saved. In a few moments
however the train started and in three hours we were in Gordonsville. Here,
we were taken from the train to the Provost Marshal's Office. That
functionary was one Dr. Boyle, a renegade from Washington, and about the
seediest looking specimen of pomposity I have seen for a long time. He
volunteered a great deal of impudent advice to us, informed us very politely
"that he hadn't the least doubt we would have our cravats very materially
tightened [sic] when we reached the Capital, and wound up requesting his
Sergeant to convey us to the guard house. Thither we went, and found
ourselves soon jammed into a small dirty room, with a hundred or two of the
filthiest wretches you ever beheld. They were principally deserters, many of
them from North Carolina regiments--were very communicative, tried to be
agreeable, in fact, appeared to have tried a little of everything except
soap and water. Their amusements appeared to be very limited. They would
sing 'My Maryland' and then take a scratch, discuss the Partisan Ranger
question, curse Jeff Davis and Secretary Malory, and then take another
scratch, roll on the floor and try to sleep, smoke their nasty pipes, and
make themselves most especially and generally disagreeable and repulsive.
For forty-eight hours we were confined in the miserable loathsome cell, and
during that time received but four dry crackers to each man. After that time
right glad were we to have the sergeant of the guard summon us so get ready
for Richmond. As we marched to the cars, we passed Major General Stewart and
Staff. There is nothing peculiar, or particularly striking about his style
and manner, although as you are well aware he is a dashing horseman, and a
great favorite in the southern ranks. He is apparently a man of forty years
of age, with long red hair and beard and is remarkably tall, perhaps six
feet two or three inches. I also saw in Gordonsville, a man who had more to
do in bringing Jackson's forces into Maryland and along our border, than any
other man in the South. I refer to Col. Bradley Johnson, formerly of
Frederick, Md., as contemptible, and blatant a boaster and braggart as
treats the globe. In Frederick, he bore the reputation of a drunken
'rounder,' and by forming an alliance with the southern army was petted for
a time by men of some standing about Richmond, simply because he hailed from
the dubious and time-loyal state of Maryland.

He represented to them that an advance of their forces in to his State would
develope [sic] a tremendous uprising of the people, who would bail the
advent of the stars and bars with every token of delight. We all remember
his proclamation to the citizens of Frederick, when Jackson made his
unfortunate pic-nic excursion to that place. The infamous misrepresentations
of this man have redounded to his own discredit, and the Administration at
Richmond have publicly and righteously stigmatized him as a falsifier.

Leaving Gordonsville in a train of cattle cars at 8 o'clock P.M., after an
unpleasent [sic] ride of five hours we arrived at Richmond, and surrounded
by a strong guard were promptly marched along the dark, silent streets of
that famous and yet infamous reservoir of treason, to the celebrated Libby
prison. Our names were quickly registered in the office of the institution,
our clothes thoroughly searched, and the turnkey without speaking a word,
rudely pushed us into a room as dark as Erebus, turned the key, and left us
alone to our reflections[.] I stood perfectly still, lest by moving, I might
tread on some sleeping prisoner, for the deep breathing and heavy snoring
indicated that there was any quantity around me. I did not speculate on
matters long, but, tired, hungry and covered with dust, sat down on the
floor and was quickly sound asleep.

'Libby Prison,' which has acquired considerable notoriety, on account of
being the princidal [sic] depot in the South for the storage of Northern
prisoners, consists of three large three story brick buildings adjoining
each other. Each of these buildings has been used for the tobacco commission
business, and in their external and internal appearance differ but little
from a similar number of large business houses in any of our Northern
cities. The management of the establishment, is in the hands of Brigadier
General winder, Post Captain Wirts (an ugly customer), Adjutant W. Peacock
(an Englishman by birth, and a deserter from New York Ninth) and Commissary
Sergeant Hitchcock. The latter was kind and accommodating, and will never be
forgotten by our group, for his many little acts of courtesy and kindness to
us. Post Captain Wirts is an Austrian by birth; and for many years figured
as a turnkey in one of the most prominent prisons of Vienna. He is a
bilious, sallow, cross, disagreeable a man as I ever saw. Always scolding,
never smiling, every effort of his to be spiteful and revengeful was
invariably a most brilliant success. When the flag of truce boat would
arrive, bringing our letters from kind absent friends, and when we were
anxiously expecting to have them sent in, this man would expose them to our
view, handle them, and then return them to his pocket, for the sole purpose
of tantalizing us. This he would do day after day, after the arrival of
every boat, and our letters would never reach us until they had remained a
week or two in the hands of this incarnate fiend. Adjutant Peacock was one
of your harmless unpleasant men who took great delight in telling us all the
bad news he possibly could, without favoring us with even the smallest
possible allowance of good news. He openly boasted of his desertion and
justified it because our Government took no step to have him released when
he was captured by the rebels and thrown into prison at Salisbury, N.C.

Libby prison has many different apartments devoted to the various classes of
prisoners that are confined within its walls, such as Northern citizens,
wounded and sick Federal soldiers, Federal privates, McClellan's and
Burnside's officers, Pope's Hessians, and the basement is appropriated to
the northern negro servants. Of the several classes enumerated, each party
had a separate room of which I know but little excepting the particular
apartment appropriated to the commissioned officers of General Pope, who by
special proclamation of his Excellency, Jefferson, the First were to be
treated as felons and outlaws, and not as prisoners of War.

The room referred to, and in which I spent six long and dreary weeks before
I recrossed its portals was eighty feet long, and forty wide the ceiling or
upper flooring supported by fourteen large pillars. The flooring was covered
with coarse thick matting of tobacco juice and dirt about an inch thick,
which could not be eradicated by the combined efforts of soap, water and
brush. The year of the room, faced on the canal and James river, the front,
on what had formerly been a prominent business locality, but which now
looked as deserted, as if infested by the Plague. This was the room into
which I was ruthlessly thrust on the night of my arrival in Richmond, and on
awakening in the morning I found it to contain a motely [sic] assembly of
about three hundred persons, consisting of sutlers, ambulance drivers,
sanitary committees, Brigadier Generals, Field Staff and Line Officers, with
a sprinkling of Richmond pick-pockets, burglars, and hotel-thieves. The
latter select representatives were inserted for the purpose of making Pope's
officers feel as disagreeable as possible, and I must say, the plot
succeeded remarkably well. The door of our room was always open, and
protected by a sentry. Another sentry figured in the ante-room, while a
whole chain of double guards completely encircled the entire building to
provide against any possible contingency of our escape. The position was a
most humiliating one, and in direct violation and contravention of all known
rules of civil[i]zed warfare throughout the world. The sentries were
generally rough illiterate fellows who had been readily taught to offer us
any indignity they possibly could, and as they patroled [sic] along would
frown on us as if we were so many assassins and horse-thieves.

     Stately sentry! Stalwart sentry,
     Pacing by yon massive gate,
     Why cast thy furtive glances
     Of Vengeance and of Hate,
     As you stalk along so measuredly
     Apast my prison gate?

     We are no groveling felons, sir,
     But slandered by the name--
     We'll wear the loathsome stigma
     Till posterity and fame
     Shall wipe it out and give to thee
     A transfer of its shame.

     Thou art guarding, trusty sentry--
     Of the dark and flashing eye,
     Thou art guarding moral heroes
     Who would rather kneel and die,
     Than compromise a bar or note
     Of Freedom's battle cry

In a late number of 'Blackwood,' there is an interesting, well written
article on the courtesies of war which I would commend to the Secretary of
War, of the great unrecognized Southern Confederacy. The manner in which we
were treated in many particulars, while inmates of the Confederate State
Prison, was shameful, and a disgrace to the age. Contrary to general belief,
I must state that the rations allowed us were of a very good quality
consisting of good bread, fresh meat, salt, vinegar and soap. I will quote
from my memorandum book a few instances of coarse brutality on the part of
the sentries, whose crimes were winked at by the prison officials, and
openly applauded by some of the Richmond papers. 'Aug't. 19th. Lieutenant
Campbell shot by the rear sentry--severely but not mortally wounded.' This
occured [sic] about 6 o'clock. A.M, Lieut C had been washing at the hydrant,
and while drying his face with a towel unthinkingly walked towards the
window to inhale the fresh morning air, the miscreant sentinal [sic], not
ten paces off, took deliberate aim at him and fired, the ball passing
through his left side, and the fleshy part of his left arm. Five hours
afterwards, the Rebel Surgeon came in to dress his wounds. Lieut. Campbell
is attached to the regular army, and his family reside in Pittsburg [sic].

Aug. 21st Lieut. Fisher, U.S.A., heavily ironed by Post Captain Wirts for
using the word 'rebel' in one of his letters. Lieut. F. was a delicate
sickly officer, and for using the word rebel instead of confederate, was
sent for by Wirts, who upbraided and damned him most unmercifully and then
sent him to our room heavily ironed.

Sept. 5th, Sutler Higgins, of Philadelphia, shot through the heart by Sentry
Owens, Co. E Elliot's City Battery. Higgins was a fine looking respectable
man, and was reclining on his cot reading at the time he was shot. He
expired in five minutes.

Sept. 18th 9 o'clock P.M. A citizen prisoner from an adjoining room was shot
by the guard in attempting to escape. The report of the firing soon caused a
miscellaneous excited crowd to congregate in front of our room, armed with
shot guns, revolvers, axes, &c. It was with the greatest difficulty this mob
was restrained from breaking in and butchering us in cold blood. We were
unarmed, and of course could make no resistance.

Among the papers in Richmodd [sic] that were anxious to excite public wrath
and indignation against us, none figured more energetically and
surreptitiously to attain that end than the "Dispatch."

Day after day this blood thirsty editor who controls that infamous sheet,
would exaggerate the ou[t]rages of the northern soldierey [sic], and call
upon the Administration to lopp of[f] the heads of a few of Pope's officers.
At every act and order of Butler in New Orleans, or Hunter in the
south-east, this coarse brutal demon would point the excited public eye
towards us and roar lustily for more blood!

The amiable Post Captain Wirts allowed a Sutler to come into our quarters
three times a week, of course, he had nothing to do with a division of the
huge profits made off by the Yanks.' We exchanged our funds for confederate
money, receiving forty per cent premium for the same. The sutler furnished
us with a variety of vegetables &c., at the following reasonable rats, which
in justice to him I will state, were but a fraction higher than the actual
prices paid for the same by the citizens of Richmond I open market. Potatoes
eight dollars per bushel, Tomatoes, Onions, apples, peaches and cigars, one
dollar per dozen, sugar seventy-five cents per pound, coffee, three dollars
per pound, and matches seventy-five cents per box.

Occasionally, Post Captain Wirts fearing that reading the morning papers was
entirely too much of a luxury for us, would prohibit their introduction. And
when we did receive them it was at twenty-five cents each. At one time
anterior to this unholy rebellion the 'Examiner, Enquirer and Whig, were as
ably edited papers as could be found in the country. Now they are pale,
sickly, billious [sic] looking half-sheets, filled with low scandal and
substitute advertisements; a good substitute brings from ten to fifteen
hundred dollars. Our amusements while in prison were meagre. The bone-ring
business soon lost its charms, and the peach stone trade became stale and
uninteresting. When we would hear bad news (and Heaven knows we heard enough
of it within those hateful walls.) we would go to bed. When we heard good
news from the North, we would innocently ask the Post Captain 'if there was
anything up,' and serenade him with the 'red white and blue,' and old John
Brown.'

Our stay there made us quite conversant with the culinary and laundress
professions, and it was no uncommon sight to see at one view, a portly
Colonel peeling potatoes, a dashing Aid de-camp stewing tomatoes, and some
tasteful young Lieutenant hanging over the fire, with a face as red as a par
boiled lobster, cooking 'hash' and such 'ash'! may I never look upon its
like again! We had our jokes, our songs and our puns 'ad Libby-tum.' We had
Cribbage, muggins, draughts and [illegible]ack straws; we were restricted of
course, but yet we had more license than one would suppose.

During our entire imprisonment no one in our body bore himself more like a
soldier and gentleman than Brigadier General Prince of the Regular Army. He
had no complaints to make, and only smiled contemptuously at the indignities
which were attempted to be heaped upon a man of his rank and position. The
battles in Maryland had much to do with our release, and on the 26th day of
September after an incarceration of forty-two days in a semi-dungeon as
loathsome as the Bastile [sic], we were hurried away early in the morning to
escape the mob. We engaged carriages at five dollars a seat, and in two
hours reached our flag truce at Varina. Ragged, hungry, weak and dejected,
can I describe to you our feelings as we approached our little vessel with
the old stars and stripes floating gaily from its flag-staff. As we boarded
her, we made the very welkin ring with three times three, and a tiger that
made the little craft fairly shiver at her moorings.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 4, c. 1

                                The Election.

The election is over and has resulted gloriously for the Democracy. We have
elected our candidate for Congress in this district, the State Senator and
both members of the Legislature. On the County ticket we have elected the
Sheriff, District Attorney and Director of the Poor, and on the balance of
the ticket are boaten [sic] but a few votes. Well done for Franklin County,
which gave a majority of one thousand against us last year.

The result in the State has been equally glorious and cheering for the
Democracy. We have elected a majority of members of Congress and a majority
of eight or ten of the lower branch of the State Legislature, which gives us
a majority on joint ballot and secures the election of a Democrat to the
United States Senate in place of Hon. David Wilmot. The vote on the State
ticket is close, but it is generally conceded now, that Messrs. Slenker and
Barr, the Democratic candidates for Auditor General and Surveyor General are
elected by small majorities.

Thus has the glorious "old Keystone State" spoken in favor of the
Constitution and Union, as they were made and transmitted to us by our
revolutionary ancestors, and against the many arbitrary and tyranical [sic]
acts of the party in power, against the suspension of the writ of habeas
corpus in the loyal States, against the arrest of peaceable citizens without
warrant or authority of law and their confinements in Forts and Bastiles
without being allowed a hearing, against the unconstitutional proclamation
of the President, proclaiming freedom to 3,000,000 negroes in the South, to
be turned loose upon the country, to enter into competition with white men
and eat out their substance, and against fanaticism, bigotry, tyrrany [sic]
and despotism in all their different phases and forms.

In Ohio and Indiana the verdict in favor of the eternal principles of
Constitutional liberty , as maintained and defended by the Democratic party
has been still more emphatic and decisive. Will Mr. Lincoln listen to the
voice of the people, as expressed through the ballot box? Will he now cut
loose from those radical and dangerous men, whose mad counsels he has lately
followed? Will he retrace his steps, discard radicalism, plant himself
firmly on the broad principles of the Constitution, adhere to the old
landmarks and make an honest effort to save the Government from destruction?
If he will do this all may yet be well. If he will do this the Democratic
and Conservative masses will rally to his support as one man, in a vigorous
prosecution of the war for the suppression of this unholly [sic] rebellion
and the restoration of the Union as it was and to maintain the supremacy of
the Constitution, with all the rights of the citizen under it, remaining
unchanged and unimpaired.

If Mr. Lincoln will thus steer the ship of State, in the course indicated by
the people at the ballot box, we repeat, all may yet be well. If he will not
do it and refuses to be governed by the voice of the people at the ballot
box, we repeat, all may yet be well. If he will not do it and refuses to be
governed by the voice of the people, we will be launched out on a sea of
chaos without either rudder or compass to steer the old ship, and the best
Government ever devised by the wisdom of man we fear, will be totally
destroyed for want of a proper helmsman, and with it constitutional liberty
on this Continent. Will he heed the warning?

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 4, c. 2

                          The Harrisburg Telegraph.

This filthy and disgusting vehicle of lies and blackguardism, in its issue
of the 15th inst., copies a short account of the Rebel Raid into this
county, from our local columns, and says:

     "The above is all a Breckenridge organ could utter in reference to
     the outrages of the rebels in Chambersburg, while it devotes a
     whole page of the same number to the abuse of the loyal
     government, now struggling to put down rebellion, &c."

It is scarcely necessary to make any reply to the Telegraph. It has become
so mean and despicable as to be beneath the notice of respectable people and
consequently harmless. It is owned by a miserable Hessian and is edited by a
hired mercenary.

We had previously announced that our paper would be issued on Saturday, and
all our matter was prepared with that view. On Friday night the rebel horde
came down upon us, rendering it impossible to carry out our intention. The
short account we published was written hastily on Monday morning while the
forms were closing and contained all the facts in relation to this
humiliating invasion. We had neither time nor inclination to write a column
or two of sensation stuff, containing little else than falsehood--we leave
that to the --and contented ourself with giving the truth in a small space.

The Telegraph lies deliberately, and wilfully [sic] lies when it charges us
with devoting any space to the abuse of the government. We never have
abused, and never will abuse our government. We love it with our whole soul,
and will always stand up for and defend it against the assaults of its
enemies be they Abolitionists or Secessionists. Yet we must be permitted to
dissent from a number of the acts of the present Administration, which our
judgment cannot approve. We have supported, and will always support, the
Administration in a vigorous and energetic prosecution of the war for the
suppression of this infernal rebellion, but when it urges measures
destructive of that end we will raise a warning voice, and so far as we can,
endeavor to stay the mischief.

In the event of a future raid into Cumberland Valley, should the rebels
succeed in penetrating as far as Harrisburg, Bergner will not be found this
side the Canada line, and we much doubt if the Telegraph will contain either
a long or short account of it, until they have retired, or been driven back
as far as Richmond.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 4, c. 4

                             Victory! Victory!!

                              Glorious Victory!

 The People Speak in Favor of the Union as it was, the Constitution as it is
                       and the Negroes where they are.

   Democracy Endorsed--Fanaticism, Abolitionism and Niggerism Repudiated.

 A Democratic Congressman, Democratic Senator, Members of Assembly, Sheriff,
            District Attorney, and Director of the Poor Elected.

                          Franklin County Redeemed.

In another column we publish the official returns of the county, and below
we give the returns from the different counties in the State as far as they
have been received.
                             The State Ticket.
                 Democratic Majorities Republican Majorities
                Adams,             500 Alleghany,      4,500
                Armstrong,         500 Chester,        2,000
                Bedford,           640 Dauphin,          900
                Berks,           5,914 Delaware,       1,300
                Bucks,             702 Franklin,          17
                Cambria,         1,000 Indiana,        2,000
                Carbon,            700 Lancaster,      4,989
                Centre,            600 Lebanon,          850
                Clearfield,      1,000 Mifflin,          150
                Clinton,           300 Philadelphia,   2,000
                Columbia,        1,400 Snyder,           400
                Cumberland,        844 Somerset,       1,000
                Fayette,           900 Union,            500
                Fulton,            200 Erie,           1,500
                Greene,          2,000 Huntingdon,       400
                Juniata,           800 Susquehanna,      800
                Lehigh,          1,949 Tioga,          1,300
                Luzerne,         2,821 Potter,           600
                Lycoming,        1,200
                Montgomery,      1,647
                Montour,           409
                Northampton,     2,464
                Northumberland,    900
                Perry,             300
                Schuylkill,      1,700
                Sullivan,          850
                Washington,        600
                Westmoreland,    1,500
                York,            3,000

Fifteen Democratic Congressmen elected out of twenty-four and a majority in
the Legislature on joint ballot--securing the election of a Democrat to the
U.S. Senate, in place of that Old Abolitionist, David Wilmot. Glory enough
for a year!

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 4, c. 5

               Correspondence From "the Army of the Potomac".

                   Correspondence of the Spirit and Times.

                                                  Camp Near Sharpsburg, Md.
                                                        October 18th, 1862.

Messrs. Editors: In a letter from Virginia during the first rebel invasion
of Maryland, your correspondent stated that he had concluded to write a few
lines, although he felt uncertain whether "Stonewall" Jackson would allow
you to publish them; week before last, however, the most stringent orders
being left by Gen. Stewart (as he passed through our lines, on his small
pleasure excursion through Franklin County) positively forbidding newspaper
correspondence, on pain of confinement in the "Libby" prison; and, at the
same time, several of our Generals having expressed a desire that the
important military movements then on foot, (and which no doubt completely
took you all by surprise) should not be made known; and also bearing, from
"a most reliable gentleman, just from the scat of war," that the Valley
Spirit office was burned to the ground, your correspondent concluded to
await patiently "the development of events." And this is why you received no
letter last week. Strange to say, we of the army of the Potomac, who had
gone forth, with so many loud words about protecting our firesides from the
ruthless tread of the invader, first learned of the Rebel occupation of
Chambersburg, through a stray copy of the Philadelphia Inquirer which
reached camp by way of Harper's Ferry; and you may easily imagine the
excitement that one paper produced. Never before had that journal been so
successful in its role of a "sensation" newspaper. A hundred men wanted to
read at once, and those who read aloud were only greeted with cries of
"louder! louder!" from the unfortunate ones on the outer circles of the
crowd that assembled almost in the twinkling of an eye. Some doubted, some
disputed, and, I am sorry to say, some few swore, despite the general
determination to keep up the reputation of the regiment which seems so
prevalent since our water-melon spree. But there it was in black and white:
Col. McClure and "Provost Marshal Stimmell" had done the work, and
Chambersburg was part and parcel of the dominions of Jefferson D. In fact
many had already begun to discuss the questions of allegiance--Chambersburg
has united her fortunes with the Rebel States, is it our duty to go to the
South also or to remain with the North. Thus we reasoned, and after several
days deliberation, we concluded to adopt the former alternative, and, on
Thursday morning, the 12th, in company with a number of other Pennsylvania
Regiments, boldly marched out of their camp, crossed the Potomac--all the
hills to their rear covered with frowning cannon--passed a short distance
beyond Shepherdstown, and their laid down their arms--for a few moments
rest. What else they did I will record further on.

I would not be considered estimating lightly the seriousness of the late
Rebel raid. We felt the mortification and disgrace keenly, anxious
countenance could be seen amongst us for many dreary and uncertain days, and
we now sympathize deeply with those who have suffered by this daring
movement; but the consequences are so much lighter than we believed them to
be, that we all console ourselves by laughing away our "blues," and treating
the affair as a very good joke, as it certainly is upon us, who marched to
the Potomac to defend our homes.

On Wednesday night, we received orders to prepare two days cooked rations
and to be ready to march at daylight--where, we knew not. Soon after gaining
the road, however, our faces were turned towards Dixie, and expectation was
at once on tip toe. We crossed the canal and river, the water being two or
three feet deep, and the morning sufficiently frosty to render the cold bath
exhilarating. After passing through Shepherdstown, where we saw but a single
manifestation of Union feeling several companies were deployed to the right
and left as skirmishers, among which were company A. Capt. Doebler had
orders to follow and keep in sight of a company of the 91st Penna. The
Captain of this company, being rather incautious, exceeded the rule always
to keep wit[i]n sight of your regiment, and led us quite a distance from the
road. In the mean time our whole Division had halted, but we kept on until
we came near a battery which had opened up and was doing some heavy firing,
thinking it was ours. When within a distance of two or three fields of it,
the Captains ascended a little knoll, to get a better view of it, when, lo
and behold! it was firing directly towards our main body! This was deemed
strange conduct for a Federal battery and we were just beginning to fall
back on to safer ground, when around turns one of the guns upon us, and
"whiz-z-z--bang" goes a shell within thirty feet of us. "Forward! Double
Quick!" is so promptly obeyed, it needs no repetition--and then comes
another shell still closer. Ugh! it sounds as if it was coming directly
towards your head. But no, it strikes the ground and is buried--no
explosion; boys you are safe! Now make the ravine as soon as possible. You
are in the rebel lines; get out of the range of those guns, and you may get
safely back, if there are no cavalry on your track. We did reach the
ravine--the gunners lost sight of us--and there was no cavalry on your
track. We did reach the ravine--the gunners lost sight of us--and there was
no cavalry in pursuit. So we live to record the adventure.

After regaining the regiment, our whole Division was formed in line of
battle. The Eleventh Regulars to the right of the main road, the 126th
immediately in their rear; the Fourteenth Regulars to the left and the 91st
Penna. in their rear. The others following in solid column. After advancing
in this way, for several miles, the cannonading to our front became
deafening, and the shells whistled by us or exploded in the air over our
heads. We draw near the junction of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad and the
Shepherdstown and Winchester turnpike; the Regulars cross the hill: "Halt!
Ground Rest." More terrifically roar the cannon, and suddenly the rattle of
musketry breaks upon the ear, sounding like pop guns or the crackling of a
large fire beside the deep voiced Parrott guns. Look sharp, boys, the
Regulars are at it, and we come next. The Regulars are at in good earnest,
too, firing a volley and advancing with a cheer. There comes an Aid, now is
our time: "Attention Batallion [sic], shoulder arms, forward march!" is
quickly and firmly given and as quickly and firmly obeyed. Into the hollow
we go, and up the next hill; on before us go the Regulars; and away
"skedaddle" the Rebels--leaving us in possession of the field, and five of
their dead. Our loss was confined to the regulars--and amounted to one
killed, one mortally wounded, who died the same night, and a half dozen
slightly wounded. The rebel position was well chosen, the country being very
hilly and so thickly wooded that but a few hundred yards were visible at any
one time. Their force consisted of a Battery, two regiments of Infantry and
a battallion of Cavalry.

It was almost dark, and our cavalry having reported the enemy still
retreating, our officers deemed it best to go no further; and we retired a
mile or so from the railroad and encamped for the night. We had taken no
extra luggage with us but our overcoats and two days rations, and it rained
heavily nearly all night. So you may imagine, we had a dreary time of it.

Early next morning we were on the march, after the retreating few. He did
not care, however, to give us battle, though his cavalry generally kept in
sight. We had started out, with a force of about ten thousand, to make a
reconnoisance in force as far as Leetown, and to return if possible by the
end of the second day. We reached the vicinity of this place, nearly ten
miles from Shepherdstown, about noon, and, after halting an hour for dinner
and rest, started on our homeward march. We had succeeded in opening
communication with McClellan from Harper's Ferry. But we had heard nothing
from the Williamsport reconnaisance and it was reported that a heavy rebel
force was advancing upon us from that direction. It was therefore desirable
to reach the river before dusk, and we marched the whole distance at quick
time, with but a single rest of a few moments, and reached camp by ten
o'clock at night, wet, sore and almost exhausted. Passing through
Shepherdstown, on our return, the regiment sang the Star Spangled Banner,
Hail Columbia, and other patriotic airs, for the especial edification of its
rebel population. So ended the reconnoisance from Conrad's Ferry, which was
pronounced by Gen. Porter to be the most successful of any of the war.

To-day Gen. Thomas, Assistant Secretary of the State of Pennsylvania,
presented the 126th, 129th and 134th Regiments with their State flags, in a
neat address. Gen. Humphreys, in handing them to their respective regiments,
expressed the wish that they should never be given up to the foe unless he
directed it; if they complied with this request they would take them home
with them without a stain of dishonor.

I take pleasure in recording the fact that Major Austin has been reinstated.
His friends felt confident that an investigation of his case would see him
righted. He has not yet joined the regiment but is expected here in a few
days.

Strange as it may seem to you, we had an election in Camp, last Tuesday,
despite the decision of the Supreme Court against the constitutionality of
the army vote. And stranger yet not a single Democrat dreamt of an election
being held, until noon of Monday, when the papers were sent to the Captains
of Companies, yet these same papers had been in camp, together with a
bountiful supply of Republican tickets, more than a week. There not being a
single printed Democratic ticket at hand, those of that persuasion at first
determined not to vote, but, on Tuesday morning, some of us concluded to do
so, merely to give an expression of our opinions for we attached no
consequence to the result of the army vote. Had we had tickets and a days
more time, we could with a little exertion, have polled at least forty more
votes that we can now count. I give you the returns for some of the
principle offices, which will no doubt be a matter of interest to some of
your readers.

Election Returns, 126th Regiment, P.V.

The eight Franklin County companies give a majority of about 141 for the
Republican State ticket.

No doubt many of your Franklin County "par-excellence patriots" will try to
account for the recent Democratic victory by alleging that all the
Republicans have gone to the war, and the Democrats remained at home to
vote. You can readily give the lie to the assertion by refering [sic] to
these returns. There are but one hundred and forty one more Republican
voters than Democratic voters in the eight companies from Franklin, while
the Juniata companies have given very respectable majorities for some of the
Democratic candidates. All told these were but 208 Republican votes polled.

                                                                         K.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 5, c. 4

                    " A great deal has been said . . . "

     A great deal has been said about the "cowardice" of the
     Chambersburgers. It is said they might have repulsed and routed
     this attacking force one thousand cavalry with very little
     trouble, or at least scared them away, as did the farmers of Adams
     county. Certain it is there was a strong desire evinced by the
     Home Guard of Chambersburg to meet the enemy in battle army. There
     were fifteen hundred stand of arms, and accoutrements and
     ammunition there sufficient to have protected the place, but it is
     said no one would give permission to distribute these arms and
     accoutrements.

We copy the above from the Harrisburg correspondence of the Philadelphia
Inquirer of the 13th inst. We are at a loss to know how this truthful
correspondent got his information. The "Home Guard" mustered exactly
forty-eight men, with muskets. The rebels numbered about 1500 men with
carbines and four pieces of rifled cannon. Had our Home Guard and citizens
tried to scare them "as did the farmers of Adams county," it would have
required no Prophet to predict the result. The "fifteen hundred stand of
arms" numbered four hundred packed away in boxes in a ware house around
which a rebel guard was placed before one fourth of our citizens knew that
the Philistines were upon us. It would have been an act of madness to have
made resistance under the circumstances, and would have involved the total
destruction of the town. The people of our town are as brave as any people.
It is usually the habit of cowards to stigmatise others with "cowardice."

We intend organizing a Brigade of Scarers to operate in case of future
raids, and would like to get those "Farmers of Adams county" as veteran
scarers to join. The position of Brigadier will remain open for the
correspondent of the Inquirer. He is the right man for the position.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 22, 1862, p. 6, c. 1

                              A Negro Invasion.

We are informed by a gentleman residing in the Southern part of this
township that, a few evenings since, three big, ugly, black female niggers
came to a farm house in his neighborhood and asked to stay all night. But
they were told they could not stay.

A few moments after the arrival of the wenches--the "contras" having the
affair all arranged--there came a second lot, consisting of four big, ugly,
black male niggers. The family became still more frightened at this new
feature in 'politics,' said they could give them their supper, but could not
possibly accommodate them through the night.

The darkies, thinking there was no 'millenium' [sic] about that kind of
talk, spoke up all about the same time and all in about the same strain, as
follows:

'O yes, dat's de way we am served; you white people in de Norf told us to
run away from our masters, an' would treat us like brudders an' dis am the
way we am treated.'

A lively war of words here ensued--in fear on the part of the white family,
but in an insolent and determined manner on the part of the niggers.

They took the supper; and not only that; but they staid all night against
the remonstrance of the proprietors of the house, and never said so much as
even 'thanky.'

The beauty of the thing is, however, the whole of this white family, who
were slaves to the nigger on this occasion, had been pretty well
abolitionized, arose the next morning with the dawn, most effectually cured
of abolitionism, and about as good Democrats as that ism generally
makes--and it makes them when it does make, most awful sound!

This is only the beginning. Before a great while these runaway blacks will
be among us as thick as five in a bed.--Perry County Union.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 29, 1862, p. 5, c. 1

                            The Drafted Militia.

We think that we never saw a finer body of men, physically, than the drafted
men that appeared in our town on Tuesday last. They are much superior, as a
general thing, to the volunteers, and judging from appearances will make as
good, if not better, soldiers, than any that this County has already sent to
the "tented field." Universal good humor prevailed amongst them and every
man we conversed with expressed a determination to "pitch into" the Rebels
as soon as they got a chance.

It is highly probable that the drafted men of the border counties, will go
into camps, near the state line, for the protection of the Old Commonwealth
from future incursions of horse thieves under Stuart and Hampton. The
government should, by all means, establish a camp near this place and send
here several batteries of artillery, so that if the enemy again makes an
inroad, in this direction, we may be able to give him a warm reception.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------

Valley Spirit, October 29, 1862, p. 5, c. 2

                            Camp on the Potomac.

For the Spirit and Times.

                                                Battle Field of "Antietam,"
                                                        October 20th, 1862.

Messrs Editors: I have thought it due my my [sic] company to give some
expression of my regard for them, and state some matters connected with our
movements, through the public prints. The company designated "G" in the
126th Regiment, Penna. Vols, was among the first reported at Harrisburg, for
the Nine Months service. We left Harrisburg on the 15th of August and
crossed the Beng Bridge at Washington into Virginia the following day. Since
that period we have occupied various camps near Washington and Alexandria
and this section of Maryland. We have marched fully two hundred miles afoot,
and a portion of our late principal march, namely, from beyond Frederick, to
Antietam Battle Field about 27 miles over two mountains, and by night, in 14
hours was certainly one of the most remarkable of this war. It is now nearly
three months since we were mustered into the U.S. Army, and I am proud to
say that at this date I have every man of the original number yet in my
command. A few are sick in the hospital and from the same cause one or two
are absent with leave. None, however, are seriously ill. Not one of my men
have "deserted," or been arrested for any dishonorable act or for any
flagrant violation of the Regulations of the Army. I accept their past
conduct as a guarantee for the future in this respect. At this time the roll
of my company exhibits as many men for active duty as any other in the
Regiment.

It affords me no little pleasure to be enabled to speak in commendatory
language of the general conduct of my company. I can say frankly and
candidly that they are always prompt and faithful in the discharge of any
duty assigned them. To the officers they are respectful, courteous, and
obedient. In their intercourse with one another, on and off duty, they are
kind, generous and forbearing. Their persons they keep as clean as it is
possible to do in camp, and their quarters evidence order and neatness. They
have given proof that they are ready at any time to engage actively in the
business of their organization, namely fighting for the Stars and Stripes
and the glorious cause of their country. Arriving on the day following the
battle of Antietam, but before it was certain that that sanguinary contest
had ended, they were full of enthusiastic ardor, and ready to march into
position with the rest of the army at the word of command. Again, when
notified by Gen Tyler, the brave Commander of this Brigade, on the next
Saturday, that they would certainly face the enemy in conflict within a very
short time, they were ready without flinching for the order to move. On the
late reconnaissance over and several miles beyond the Potomac into the
enemy's country, and which was fraught with danger at every step they
proceeded bravely and determinedly. The enemies shells and bullets came
towards them thick and fast, but they still advanced boldly over rough roads
and newly furrowed fields, climbing rocks and high fences and pushing
through almost impenetrable woods. They did all this without a murmur or
faltering in the least.

I make this record of my command after three months intimate association
with them for the simple purpose of indicating to their relatives and
friends, their past conduct and what we may all hope for in the future. I
have spoken of them with no intention to disparage the claims of my fellow
officers and their companies, in this regiment, or to undervalue their
services, for we are all associated and united in a common purpose and a
sacred cause.

It may be of interest to the families of my men to know that the 31st of the
present month is the date fixed for the appearance of the Paymaster, when
each man will be paid the amount due him for three months services.

                                                           George L. Miles,
                                        Capt. Co. G. 126th Regt., Pa. Vols.

----------------------------------------------------------------------------
